Louisiana, session 2026, HB299.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Article 253(B)(3)(introductory paragraph) is
hereby amended and reenacted and Code of Civil Procedure Article 253(B)(3)(e) is hereby
enacted to read as follows:
Art. 253. Pleadings, documents, and exhibits to be filed with clerk
* * *
B.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 299 ENROLLED
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (2) of this Paragraph,
the following original documents may be filed in paper form, either in person, by
U.S. mail United States Postal Service, or by commercial courier:
* * *
(e) A jury bond.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.